test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-Clex_rammud_gt-norm.gen.yaml
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: šeštuu
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: šiäštojus
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: šiäštojoon
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: šiäštojee
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: šiäštojus
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: šiäštojop
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: šeštuđ
    šeštuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: šiäštojus
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: šeštuu
    šeštuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: šeštum
    šeštuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: šeštuuččii
    šeštuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: šeštuužii
    šeštuđ+V+PrsPrc: [šiäštojeijee, šiäštojijjee]
    šeštuđ+V+PrfPrc: šeštum
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Nom: šeštum
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Ess: šeštuumin
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Loc: šeštuumist
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Ill: šeštuumân
    šeštuđ+V+Actio+Com: šeštuudijn
    šeštuđ+V+VAbess: šeštuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - puohtuđ: # MLO
    puohtuđ+V+Inf: puohtuđ
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: puohtuum
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: puohtuuh
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: puáhtoo
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: puáhtojeen
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: puohtuuvettee
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: puohtuv
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: puohtup
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: puohtuuvetteđ
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: puáhtojeh
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: puáhtojim
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: puáhtojih
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: puohtui
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: puohtuim
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: puohtuid
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: puohtuin
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: puohtuim
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: puohtuid
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: puáhtojii
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: puohtuuččim
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: puohtuuččih
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: puohtuuččij
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: puohtuuččáim
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: puohtuuččáid
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: puohtuuččáin
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: puohtuuččijm
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: puohtuuččijd
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: puohtuuččii
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: puohtuužeem
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: puohtuužeeh
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: puohtuš      
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: puohtuužeen
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: puohtušvettee      
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: puohtuužává
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: puohtuužep
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: puohtušvetteđ      
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: puohtuužeh

    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: puohtuu
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: puáhtojus
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: puáhtojoon
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: puáhtojee
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: puáhtojus
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: puáhtojop
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: puohtuđ
    puohtuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: puáhtojus
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: puohtuu
    puohtuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: puohtum
    puohtuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: puohtuuččii
    puohtuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: puohtuužii
    puohtuđ+V+PrsPrc: [puáhtojeijee, puáhtojijjee]
    puohtuđ+V+PrfPrc: puohtum
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Nom: puohtum
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Ess: puohtuumin
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Loc: puohtuumist
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Ill: puohtuumân
    puohtuđ+V+Actio+Com: puohtuudijn
    puohtuđ+V+VAbess: puohtuuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - purruđ: # MLO
    purruđ+V+Inf: purruđ
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: purruum
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: purruuh
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porroo
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: porrojeen
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: purruuvettee
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: purruv
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: purrup
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: purruuvetteđ
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: porrojeh
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: porrojim
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: porrojih
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: purrui
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: purruim
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: purruid
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: purruin
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: purruim
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: purruid
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: porrojii
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: purruuččim
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: purruuččih
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: purruuččij
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: purruuččáim
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: purruuččáid
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: purruuččáin
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: purruuččijm
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: purruuččijd
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: purruuččii
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: purruužeem
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: purruužeeh
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: purruš      
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: purruužeen
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: purrušvettee      
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: purruužává
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: purruužep
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: purrušvetteđ      
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: purruužeh

    purruđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: purruu
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: porrojus
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Du1: porrojoon
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Du2: porrojee
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Du3: porrojus
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: porrojop
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: purruđ
    purruđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: porrojus
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: purruu
    purruđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: purrum
    purruđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: purruuččii
    purruđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: purruužii
    purruđ+V+PrsPrc: [porrojeijee, porrojijjee]
    purruđ+V+PrfPrc: purrum
    purruđ+V+Actio+Nom: purrum
    purruđ+V+Actio+Ess: purruumin
    purruđ+V+Actio+Loc: purruumist
    purruđ+V+Actio+Ill: purruumân
    purruđ+V+Actio+Com: purruudijn
    purruđ+V+VAbess: purruuhánnáá
    
    
  Verb - semmuđ: # MLO
    semmuđ+V+Inf: semmuđ
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: semmuum
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: semmuuh
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: siämmoo
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: siämmojeen
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: semmuuvettee
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: semmuv
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: semmup
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: semmuuvetteđ
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: siämmojeh
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: siämmojim
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: siämmojih
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: semmui
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: semmuim
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: semmuid
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: semmuin
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: semmuim
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: semmuid
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: siämmojii
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: semmuuččim
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: semmuuččih
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: semmuuččij
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: semmuuččáim
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: semmuuččáid
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: semmuuččáin
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: semmuuččijm
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: semmuuččijd
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: semmuuččii
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: semmuužeem
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: semmuužeeh
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: semmuš      
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: semmuužeen
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: semmušvettee      
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: semmuužává
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: semmuužep
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: semmušvetteđ      
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: semmuužeh

    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: semmuu
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: siämmojus
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: siämmojoon
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: siämmojee
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: siämmojus
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: siämmojop
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: semmuđ
    semmuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: siämmojus
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: semmuu
    semmuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: semmum
    semmuđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: semmuuččii
    semmuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: semmuužii
    semmuđ+V+PrsPrc: [siämmojeijee, siämmojijjee]
    semmuđ+V+PrfPrc: semmum
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Nom: semmum
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Ess: semmuumin
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Loc: semmuumist
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Ill: semmuumân
    semmuđ+V+Actio+Com: semmuudijn
    semmuđ+V+VAbess: semmuuhánnáá

  Verb - erduđ: # MLO
    erduđ+V+Inf: erduđ
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: erduum
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iärdoo
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: iärdojeen
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: iärdojeh
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: erduu
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: iärdojim
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: erdui
    erduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: iärdojii

  Verb - tedduđ: # MLO    
    tedduđ+V+Inf: tedduđ
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tedduum
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tiäddoo
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: tiäddojeen
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tiäddojeh
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: tedduu
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tiäddojim
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teddui
    tedduđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tiäddojii

  Verb - čovguđ: # MLO    
    čovguđ+V+Inf: čovguđ
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: čovguum
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: čuávgoo
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: čuávgojeen
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: čuávgojeh
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: čovguu
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: čuávgojim
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: čovgui
    čovguđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: čuávgojii

  Verb - cohhuđ: # MLO    
    cohhuđ+V+Inf: cohhuđ
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cohhuum
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuáhhoo
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: cuáhhojeen 
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: cuáhhojeh
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: cohhuu
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: cuáhhojim
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: cohhui
    cohhuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: cuáhhojii

  Verb - luskuđ: # MLO    
    luskuđ+V+Inf: luskuđ
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: luskuum
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: luskoo
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: luskojeen
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: luskojeh
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: luskuu
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: luskojim
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: luskui
    luskuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: luskojii

  Verb - skaappuđ: # MLO    
    skappuđ+V+Inf: skappuđ
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: skappuum
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: skáppoo
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: skáppojeen
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: skáppojeh
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: skappuu
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: skáppojim
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: skappui
    skappuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: skáppojii
    
  Verb - vuoččuđ: # generated from FST, to be checked    
    vuoččuđ+V+Inf: vuoččuđ
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuoččuum
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuoččuuh
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuáččoo
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vuáččojeen
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuoččuuvettee
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuoččuv
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuoččup
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuoččuuvetteđ
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vuáččojeh
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuáččojim
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuáččojih
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuoččui
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuoččuim
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuoččuid
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuoččuin
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuoččuim
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuoččuid
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuáččojii
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vuoččuuččim
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vuoččuuččih
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vuoččuuččij
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vuoččuuččáim
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vuoččuuččáid
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vuoččuuččáin
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vuoččuuččijm
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vuoččuuččijd
    vuoččuđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vuoččuuččii
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vuoččuužeem
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vuoččuužeeh
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vuoččuš
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vuoččuužeen
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vuoččušvettee
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vuoččuužává
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vuoččuužep
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vuoččušvetteđ
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vuoččuužeh
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Sg1: vuáččojum
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuoččuu
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuáččojus
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuáččojoon
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vuáččojee
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuáččojus
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuáččojop
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vuoččuđ
    vuoččuđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuáččojus
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuoččuu
    vuoččuđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuoččum
    vuoččuđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vuoččuužii
    vuoččuđ+V+PrsPrc: [vuáččojeijee, vuáččojijjee]
    vuoččuđ+V+PrfPrc: vuoččum
    vuoččuđ+V+Actio+Nom: vuoččum
    vuoččuđ+V+Actio+Ess: vuoččuumin
    vuoččuđ+V+Actio+Loc: vuoččuumist
    vuoččuđ+V+Actio+Ill: vuoččuumân
    vuoččuđ+V+VAbess: vuoččuuhánnáá
    
   
